Utah statutes.
17-27a-208.   Hearing and notice for proposal to vacate a public street,
right-of-way, or easement.
(1)  For any proposal to vacate some or all of a public street, right-of-way,
or easement, the legislative body shall:
(a)  hold a public hearing; and
(b)  give notice of the date, place, and time of the hearing, as provided in
Subsection (2).
(2)  At least 10 days before the public hearing under Subsection (1)(a), the
notice required under Subsection (1)(b) shall be:
(a)  mailed to the record owner of each parcel that is accessed by the public
street, right-of-way, or easement;
(b)  mailed to each affected entity;
(c)  posted on or near the street, right-of-way, or easement in a manner that
is calculated to alert the public; and
(d) (i)  published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the land subject to the petition is located; and
(ii)  published on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section
63F-1-701.
